Hawaii statutes.
[§37-112] Use of estimates. (a) The
estimates prepared by the council shall be considered by the governor in
preparing the budget, recommending appropriations and revenue measures,
projecting revenues and controlling expenditures. The legislature shall
consider these estimates in appropriating funds and enacting revenue measures.
The governor and legislature shall use the latest council estimate as the base
estimate against which their revenue estimates shall be compared.

(b) All estimates submitted by the council
shall be made public. If the legislature in appropriating funds, or if the
governor in preparing the budget uses a revenue estimate which differs from the
estimate prepared by the council, then the governor or the legislature shall
make that fact public together with reasons for using the differing revenue
estimates. [L 1980, c 278, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation added.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next